Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 19 Interstate Acquisitions of Banks and Bank Holding Companies

Law reviews.

For article, “Georgia’s Interstate Banking Legislation,” see 20 Ga. St. B.J. 186 (1984).

For note on the 1994 amendments of Code Sections 7-1-620 to 7-1-626 and enactment of Code Section 7-1-627 (now repealed) of this part, prior to the 1996 revision of this part, see 11 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 50 (1994).

7-1-620.
Purpose of this part.

This part governs the acquisition of banks having banking offices in Georgia by bank holding companies controlling bank subsidiaries having banking offices outside this state. It further governs the acquisition of banks having banking offices outside this state by bank holding companies controlling bank subsidiaries having banking offices in Georgia. It sets forth application, notice, and other related requirements. Acquisitions of banks having banking offices only in Georgia by bank holding companies controlling only bank subsidiaries having banking offices solely in Georgia are governed by the provisions of Code Sections 7-1-605 through 7-1-608.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-620

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-17/HB 811.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1, redesignated former Code Section 7-1-620 as present Code Section 7-1-621.

Law reviews.

For review of 1996 banking and finance legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

7-1-621.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Acquire,” as applied to a bank holding company, means any of the following actions or transactions:

The merger or consolidation with another bank holding company;

The acquisition of the direct or indirect ownership or control of voting shares of another bank holding company or bank if, after such acquisition, such bank holding company will directly or indirectly own or control more than 5 percent of any class of voting shares of such bank holding company or bank;

The direct or indirect acquisition of all or substantially all of the assets of another bank holding company or bank; or

The taking of any other action that would result in the direct or indirect control of another bank holding company or bank.

“Acquire” shall also include a transaction where a bank subsidiary of a bank holding company merges or consolidates with, or acquires all or substantially all of the assets of, another bank.

“Bank” means any “insured bank” as such term is defined in 12 U.S.C. Section 1813(h) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act or any institution eligible to become such, provided that the term “bank” shall not include any “foreign bank” (which is defined as in 12 U.S.C. Section 3101 of the International Banking Act of 1978). The term “bank” as used in this part shall include any savings and loan association or state savings and loan association as such terms are defined in Code Section 7-1-4 and shall include federal savings banks and similar banking entities chartered under the laws of any state and whose deposits are insured under a federal deposit insurance program.

“Bank holding company” means any company which is a bank holding company under Code Section 7-1-605.

“Bank supervisory agency” means:

The Office of Comptroller of Currency, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, and any successor to those agencies; and

The agency of a state with primary responsibility for chartering and supervising banks.

“Banking office” or “banking location” means a main office or a branch office as such terms are defined in this chapter or any other office at which a bank accepts deposits.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of banking and finance then in office and, where appropriate, all of his or her successors and predecessors in office.

“Control” means that which is set forth in Code Section 7-1-605.

“Deposits” means, with respect to a bank, all demand, time, and savings deposits of individuals, partnerships, corporations, the United States government, and states and political subdivisions in the United States. Determinations of deposits shall be made by reference to regulatory reports of condition or similar reports filed by such bank with state or federal regulatory authorities.

“Georgia bank” means a bank whose home state is Georgia.

“Georgia bank holding company” means a bank holding company that:

Has its principal place of business in the State of Georgia; and

Is not controlled by a bank holding company other than a Georgia bank holding company.

“Georgia state bank” means a bank chartered under the laws of the State of Georgia.

“Home state” means any state in the United States:

With respect to a state bank, the state by which the bank is chartered;

With respect to a national bank, the state in which the main office of the bank is located; or

With respect to a foreign bank, the state determined to be the home state of the foreign bank under 12 U.S.C. Section 3103(c) of the International Banking Act.

“Home state regulator” means, with respect to an out-of-state state bank, the bank supervisory agency of the state in which such bank is chartered.

“Host state” means a state, other than the home state of a bank, in which the bank maintains or seeks to establish and maintain a branch.

“Insured depository institution” shall have the same meaning as set forth in 12 U.S.C. Section 1813(c)(2) and (3) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, provided that the term “insured depository institution” shall not include any “foreign bank” (which is defined as in 12 U.S.C. Section 3101 of the International Banking Act of 1978).

“Interstate merger transaction” means:

The merger or consolidation of banks with different home states and the conversion of branches of any bank involved in the merger or consolidation into branches of the resulting bank; or

The purchase of all or substantially all of the assets of a bank whose home state is different from the home state of the acquiring bank.

“Out-of-state bank” means a bank whose home state is not Georgia, but the term does not include a foreign bank.

“Out-of-state bank holding company” means a bank holding company other than a Georgia bank holding company.

“Out-of-state state bank” means a bank chartered under the laws of a state other than Georgia.

“Principal place of business” of a bank holding company means the state of charter in which the aggregate deposits of the bank subsidiaries of such bank holding company are largest.

“Resulting bank” means a bank that has resulted from an interstate merger transaction under Part 20 of this article.

“State” means any state of the United States, including the District of Columbia.

“Subsidiary” means that which is set forth in Code Section 7-1-605.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-620

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1467, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 251, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 215, § 1; Code 1981, §

7-1-621

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 18; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 15; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-18/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 14/HB 143.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “banking and finance” was substituted for “the Department of Banking and Finance” in paragraph (6) and “Federal Deposit Insurance” was substituted for “FDI” in paragraph (15).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1, effective April 1, 1996, redesignated former Code Section 7-1-621 as present Code Section 7-1-622.

Law reviews.

For article, “Bank Directors: Understanding Their Role, Responsibility and Liability,” see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 587 (1989).

7-1-622.
Provisions applicable to interstate acquisitions or mergers by bank holding companies; eligibility of applicants; commissioner’s ruling required.

A bank holding company may acquire a bank in Georgia, and a bank holding company having its principal place of business in this state may acquire a bank having banking offices in another state, upon compliance with the provisions of Code Sections 7-1-605 through 7-1-612 and in particular Code Section 7-1-606, which provisions shall be expressly applicable to any such acquisition. Compliance with all applicable regulations, payment of applicable fees, and registration of the holding company shall be required. The restrictions of this Code section shall apply.

Notwithstanding anything contained in subsection (a) of this Code section and subject to the permitted acquisitions of subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-608, no bank or bank holding company may:

Directly or indirectly acquire a Georgia bank unless such bank has been in existence and continuously operated or incorporated as a bank for a period of three years or more prior to the date of acquisition. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing shall prohibit an out-of-state bank holding company from acquiring all or substantially all of the shares of a Georgia bank organized solely for the purpose of facilitating the acquisition of a bank which has been in existence and continuously operated as a bank for the requisite three-year period; or

Directly or indirectly acquire a bank having banking offices in Georgia if the applicant (including all insured depository institutions which are affiliates of the applicant), upon consummation of the acquisition, would control 30 percent or more of the total amount of deposits of insured depository institutions in this state. The commissioner may by regulation adopt a procedure whereby the foregoing limitations on concentration of deposits may be waived upon showing of good cause. This restriction shall not apply, in the discretion of the commissioner, to transactions complying with paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-623.

The commissioner must rule on any application seeking approval to engage in a transaction under this Code section not later than 90 days following the date of submission of a completed application seeking such approval. If the commissioner decides to hold a public hearing in connection with the application, the time limit specified may be extended to 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing.

If any acquisition involves or takes the form of an interstate merger transaction, the banks involved must comply with filing and other requirements in Part 20 of this article in addition to subsection (b) of this Code section.

This part is not intended to discriminate against out-of-state bank holding companies or against foreign bank holding companies in any manner that would violate Section 3(d) of the Bank Holding Company Act, as amended by the Riegle-Neal Interstate Banking and Branching Efficiency Act of 1994.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-621

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1467, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 215, § 2; Code 1981, §

7-1-622

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 22; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 19; Ga. L. 2002, p. 670, § 2; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 18/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted former subparagraph (b)(2)(A), which read: “Immediately before the consummation of the acquisition for which an application is filed, the applicant (including any insured depository institution affiliate of the applicant) controls any insured depository institution or any branch of an insured depository institution in this state; and”, redesignated the existing provisions of the introductory language of paragraph (b)(2) and subparagraph (b)(2)(B) as paragraph (b)(2), substituted “if the” for “if: The” in paragraph (b)(2); and deleted the former last sentence in subsection (c), which read: “If the commissioner fails to rule on the application within the requisite period, the proposed transaction shall stand approved.”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “article” was substituted for “chapter” in subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1, effective April 1, 1996, redesignated former Code Section 7-1-622 as present Code Section 7-1-623.

7-1-623.
Acquisitions not requiring department approval; notifications.

Subject to any applicable restrictions an out-of-state bank holding company having a bank subsidiary with banking offices in Georgia may acquire a bank that does not have banking offices in this state, and an out-of-state bank holding company may acquire an out-of-state bank with branch offices in Georgia without the approval of the department.

A bank holding company may engage in the transactions described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection without the necessity of complying with Code Section 7-1-622, provided that it notifies the department not less than 30 days following the consummation of the transaction.

The acquisition of a Georgia bank, if such acquisition has been consummated with assistance from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation under Section 13(c) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, as amended, 12 U.S.C. Section 1823(c); or

The acquisition of a Georgia bank, if such acquisition has been consummated in the regular course of securing or collecting a debt previously contracted in good faith, as provided in and subject to the requirements of Section 3(a) of the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended, 12 U.S.C. Section 1842(a). The bank or bank holding company must divest the securities or assets acquired within two years of the date of acquisition. The department may, in its discretion, permit the bank or bank holding company to retain such interest for up to three additional periods of one year each.

An out-of-state bank holding company acquiring a Georgia bank holding company or Georgia state bank shall notify the department upon filing an application with the appropriate federal or state financial regulator. The notification requirements of this subsection shall be satisfied by furnishing the department with a copy of the application or applications filed with applicable bank supervisory agencies seeking approval for the proposed transaction and such other information as the department shall request. In addition, the parties shall file with the department and the Secretary of State a certificate of approval of the acquisition by the appropriate supervisory agencies prior to consummation of the transaction. The department may, for good cause shown, object to the transaction by letter to the out-of-state bank holding company, the Georgia bank holding company, and to the appropriate federal or state financial regulator before consummation of the transaction. In the event of such objection, the acquisition cannot be consummated without the parties obtaining the approval of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-622

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1467, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 215, § 3; Code 1981, §

7-1-623

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 20; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-19/HB 811; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 19/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote subsection (a); substituted “The bank” for “If the bank acquired under this provision has banking offices in Georgia, the bank” at the beginning of the second sentence in paragraph (b)(2); and added subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1, effective April 1, 1996, redesignated former Code Section 7-1-623 as present Code Section 7-1-624.

7-1-624.
Prohibited acquisitions.

Except as expressly permitted under this part, Part 20 of this article, or by federal law, no bank holding company may acquire a bank or a bank holding company controlling a bank chartered by the department.

In the event any bank holding company makes an acquisition that is prohibited by this part, the commissioner shall require such bank holding company to divest itself immediately of its direct or indirect ownership or control of any Georgia banks or banking offices located in Georgia. The commissioner shall also have the power to enforce any other prohibitions in this part by requiring divestitures of nonconforming banks, bank holding companies, or assets. Alternatively, the commissioner shall have the power to impose fines and penalties or exercise such other remedies as are provided in this chapter, including, but not limited to, judicial actions.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-623

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1467, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 215, § 4; Code 1981, §

7-1-624

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-20/HB 811.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1, effective April 1, 1996, redesignated former Code Section 7-1-624 as present Code Section 7-1-625.

7-1-625.
Provisions applicable to, and qualification of, bank holding companies in state; reciprocal agreements; confidentiality of reports.

Any Georgia bank holding company controlling a bank having banking offices in Georgia and any out-of-state bank holding company controlling a Georgia state bank shall be subject to the provisions of Code Sections 7-1-605 through 7-1-612 and the rules and regulations of the department applicable to bank holding companies.

Any out-of-state bank holding company that has a bank subsidiary with banking offices in Georgia that is not otherwise organized under the laws of this state or qualified to do business in this state shall qualify to do business in this state as a foreign corporation.

The department may enter into cooperative and reciprocal agreements with the bank regulatory authorities of any state or the United States for the periodic examination of bank holding companies and may accept reports of examination and other records from such authorities in lieu of conducting its own examinations. The department may enter into joint actions with other regulatory bodies having concurrent jurisdiction or may enter into such actions independently to carry out its responsibilities under this title and assure compliance with the laws of this state. Any examinations or reports originated by Georgia or by another bank supervisory agency shall be deemed and treated as confidential according to Georgia law, and such confidentiality shall not be affected by the sharing of the examinations or reports. The department shall not be obligated to provide or disclose such examinations and reports to any third party. Agreements to share such examinations or reports shall contain provisions for dealing with confidentiality and subpoenas.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-624

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1467, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 215, § 5; Code 1981, §

7-1-625

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 12/HB 780; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 20/HB 891.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, deleted “and shall advise the department of the location of its initial registered office within this state and the name of its initial registered agent at such location” following “foreign corporation” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (b). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “Georgia” following “Any” and “and any out-of-state bank holding company controlling a Georgia state bank” in subsection (a); in subsection (b), inserted “out-of-state” following “Any” in the first sentence and deleted the former last two sentences, which read: “Such bank holding company shall agree to be bound by all the provisions of Code Sections 7-1-605 through 7-1-612 and by the provisions of this part. Any bank holding company having a Georgia bank subsidiary shall promptly advise the department of any changes in its registered office and agent.”; and, inserted “or the United States” in the first sentence in subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1, effective April 1, 1996, redesignated former Code Section 7-1-625 as present Code Section 7-1-626.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-626.
Severability; construction with other laws.

It is the express intention of the Georgia General Assembly to provide a unified and orderly method of permitting limited interstate banking. Thus, if any provision of this part establishing the framework within which interstate banking may occur or providing for registration, approval, and supervisory powers of the department and the commissioner is determined by final, nonappealable order of any Georgia or federal court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remaining provisions of this part shall not be affected and shall continue to apply to any bank, bank holding company, foreign bank, or other person or circumstance.

Nothing contained in this part shall be construed to amend or modify the provisions of any other part of this chapter governing the supervision or regulation of banks and bank holding companies, as defined in this part, or the organization and powers of the department and the commissioner with respect thereto as provided in such other parts.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-625

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1467, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 215, § 6; Code 1981, §

7-1-626

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, in the second sentence of subsection (a), “may occur or” was substituted for “may occur,” and a comma was deleted following “commissioner.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1, repealed former Code Section

7-1-626

, which was based on Code 1981, §

7-1-626

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, § 11; Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 6, relating to rights of bank holding companies consisting of building and loan associations.

7-1-627.
[Repealed] Resolution to except bank or bank holding company from acquisition; severability.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-627

[repealed], enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 215, § 7; repealed by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 1, effective April 1, 1996.